Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE H. RESEARCH IN HIGHER EDUCATION

CHAPTER 150. TRANSPORTATION RESEARCH

Sec. 150.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Department" means the Texas Department of Transportation.

(2) "Public senior college or university" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(3) "Transportation facilities" means highways, turnpikes, airports, railroads, including high-speed railroads, bicycle and pedestrian facilities, waterways, pipelines, electric utility facilities, communication lines and facilities, public transportation facilities, port facilities, and facilities appurtenant to other transportation facilities.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 382, Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 1997.

Sec. 150.002. CONTRACTS. (a) The department may contract with a public senior college or university for the college or university to conduct research relating to transportation, including the economics, planning, design, construction, maintenance, or operation of transportation facilities.

(b) An agreement entered into under this chapter is not subject to Chapter 771, Government Code.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 382, Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 1997.

Sec. 150.003. PAYMENT FOR SERVICES, MATERIALS, AND EQUIPMENT. (a) The comptroller may draw a warrant in favor of a public senior college or university based on a voucher or claim submitted by the college or university through the department for services rendered and materials and equipment provided by the college or university under a contract entered into under this chapter.

(b) The comptroller shall pay a warrant issued under this section out of money appropriated by the legislature to the department. Payments received by a public senior college or university under this section are local funds of the college or university.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 382, Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 1997.